Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2561.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of economic security; housing assistance; elderly; intent; exemption A. The sum of $7,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security to distribute to area agencies on aging established pursuant to the older Americans act of 1965 (P.L. 89-73; 79 Stat. 218; 42 United States Code sections 3001 through 3058ff) for housing assistance for persons who are at least sixty years of age. B. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.